apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.en.dix
<pardef n="appl/y__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ied</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ied</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="enjoy__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="pa/y__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    
<pardef n="ab/ide__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ide</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ide</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ides</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ode</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ided</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ode</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ided</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>     
    
<pardef n="approach__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
<pardef n="admit__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ted</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ted</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
<pardef n="fit__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>ted</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>ted</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
    
    

<e lm="admit"><i>admit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="carry"><i>carr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="express"><i>express</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="identify"><i>identif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="miss"><i>miss</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pay"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="publish"><i>publish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="say"><i>sa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="study"><i>stud</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="supply"><i>suppl</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="touch"><i>touch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="try"><i>tr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wish"><i>wish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
 <e lm="benefit"><i>benefit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reach"><i>reach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="apply for"><i>appl</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>for</l><r><g><b/>for</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="pay attention"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>attention</l><r><g><b/>attention</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="clarify"><i>clarif</i> <par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="accompany"><i>accompan</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="accomplish"><i>accomplish</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="embarrass"><i>embarrass</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bless"><i>bless</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fit"><i>fit</i> <par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="certify"><i>certif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="classify"><i>classif</i> <par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mass"><i>mass</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cross"><i>cross</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dismay"><i>dismay</i> <par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deploy"><i>deploy</i> <par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undress"><i>undress</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="employ"><i>employ</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="guess"><i>guess</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fortify"><i>fortif</i> <par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="envy"><i>env</i> <par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="falsify"><i>falsif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="photocopy"><i>photocop</i> <par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fry"><i>fr</i> <par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="intensify"><i>intensif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="justify"><i>justif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="furnish"><i>furnish</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="modify"><i>modif</i> <par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="display"><i>display</i> <par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="notify"><i>notif</i> <par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="omit"><i>omit</i> <par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fish"><i>fish</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prefix"><i>prefix</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pray"><i>pray</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recess"><i>recess</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="remit"><i>remit</i> <par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reply"><i>repl</i> <par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="delay"><i>delay</i> <par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="knit"><i>knit</i> <par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="betray"><i>betray</i> <par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bleach"><i>bleach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="commit"><i>commit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dignify"><i>dignify</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="study"><i>study</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="impress"><i>impress</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="obey"><i>obey</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="transmit"><i>transmit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pacify"><i>pacify</i><par n="enjoy__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="acidify"><i>acidif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="solidify"><i>solidify</i><par n="enjoy__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="exemplify"><i>exemplif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="petrify"><i>petrify</i><par n="enjoy__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="gasify"><i>gasify</i><par n="enjoy__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="stratify"><i>stratif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="mortify"><i>mortif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="staunch"><i>staunch</i><par n="approach__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="abet"><i>abet</i><par n="admit__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="defy"><i>defy</i><par n="enjoy__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="sway"><i>sway</i><par n="enjoy__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="arch"><i>arch</i><par n="approach__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="lunch"><i>lunch</i><par n="approach__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="emulsify"><i>emulsif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="bias"><i>bias</i><par n="approach__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="unfit"><i>unfit</i><par n="fit__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="lynch"><i>lynch</i><par n="approach__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="pity"><i>pit</i><par n="appl/y__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="replenish"><i>replenish</i><par n="approach__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="flex"><i>flex</i><par n="approach__vblex" /></e>
